Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201081-8,271.01
Commission on Latino-Americans Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Commission on Latino-Americans Cash Fund
is created. The Commission on Latino-Americans shall use
the fund for commission functions described in sections 81-8,262 to 81-8,271.
Money credited to the fund shall include any monetary gifts, grants, and donations.
Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any
money remaining in the Commission on Mexican-Americans Cash Fund on July 15,
2010, shall be transferred to the Commission on Latino-Americans Cash Fund
on such date.

Laws 2000, LB 1363, § 3;

Laws 2004, LB 940, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB139, § 4.
July 15, 2010
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.